Maine, session 132, LD387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 2 MRSA §11 is enacted to read:
§11. Relocation of illegal immigrants
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Governor may not relocate
illegal immigrants into this State or take any other actions intended to authorize, approve
or otherwise assist in the relocation or transportation of illegal immigrants into this State.
As used in this section, "illegal immigrant" means a person who is not lawfully present in
the United States.